Nevada, session 83, SB19.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 527 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. The Great Plains Wildland Fire Protection Compact
is hereby ratified, enacted into law and entered into with all
jurisdictions legally joining in the Compact, in substantially the
form set forth in this section:
THE GREAT PLAINS WILDLAND FIRE
PROTECTION AGREEMENT
THIS AGREEMENT is entered into by and between the State,
Provincial and Territorial wildland fire protection agencies
signatory hereto, hereinafter referred to as ‘Members’.
FOR, AND IN CONSIDERATION OF the following terms and
conditions, the Members agree:
ARTICLE I
The purpose of this compact is to promote effective prevention
and control of forest fires in the Great Plains region of the United
States by the maintenance of adequate forest fire fighting services
by the member states, and by providing for reciprocal aid in
fighting forest fires among the compacting states of the region,
including South Dakota, North Dakota, Wyoming, Colorado, and
any adjoining state of a current member state.
ARTICLE II
This compact is operative immediately as to those states
ratifying it if any two or more of the member states have ratified it.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
ARTICLE III
In each state, the state forester or officer holding the equivalent
position who is responsible for forest fire control may act as
compact administrator for that state and may consult with like
officials of the other member states and may implement
cooperation between the states in forest fire prevention and
control. The compact administrators of the member states may
organize to coordinate the services of the member states and
provide administrative integration in carrying out the purposes of
this compact. Each member state may formulate and put in effect
a forest fire plan for that state.
ARTICLE IV
If the state forest fire control agency of a member state requests
aid from the state forest fire control agency of any other member
state in combating, controlling, or preventing forest fires, the state
forest fire control agency of that state may render all possible aid
to the requesting agency, consonant with the maintenance of
protection at home.
ARTICLE V
If the forces of any member state are rendering outside aid
pursuant to the request of another member state under this
compact, the employees of the state shall, under the direction of
the officers of the state to which they are rendering aid, have the
same powers (except the power of arrest), duties, rights, privileges,
and immunities as comparable employees of the state to which
they are rendering aid.
No member state or its officers or employees rendering outside
aid pursuant to this compact is liable on account of any act or
omission on the part of such forces while so engaged, or on
account of the maintenance or use of any equipment or supplies in
connection with rendering the outside aid.
All liability, except as otherwise provided in this compact, that
may arise either under the laws of the requesting state or under
the laws of the aiding state or under the laws of a third state on
account of or in connection with a request for aid, shall be
assumed and borne by the requesting state.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Any member state rendering outside aid pursuant to this
compact shall be reimbursed by the member state receiving the aid
for any loss or damage to, or expense incurred in the operation of
any equipment answering a request for aid, and for the cost of all
materials, transportation, wages, salaries, and maintenance of
employees and equipment incurred in connection with such
request. However, nothing in this compact prevents any assisting
member state from assuming such loss, damage, expense or other
cost or from loaning such equipment or from donating such
services to the receiving member state without charge or cost.
Each member state shall assure that workers compensation
benefits in conformity with the minimum legal requirements of the
state are available to all employees and contract firefighters sent to
a requesting state pursuant to this compact.
For the purposes of this compact the term, employee, includes
any volunteer or auxiliary legally included within the forest fire
fighting forces of the aiding state under the laws of the aiding
state.
The compact administrators may formulate procedures for
claims and reimbursement under the provisions of this article, in
accordance with the laws of the member states.
ARTICLE VI
Ratification of this compact does not affect any existing statute
so as to authorize or permit curtailment or diminution of the forest
fighting forces, equipment, services, or facilities of any member
state.
Nothing in the compact authorizes or permits any member state
to curtail or diminish its forest fire fighting forces, equipment,
services, or facilities. Each member state shall maintain adequate
forest fire fighting forces and equipment to meet demands for
forest fire protection within its borders in the same manner and to
the same extent as if this compact were not operative.
Nothing in this compact limits or restricts the powers of any
state ratifying the compact to provide for the prevention, control,
and extinguishment of forest fires, or to prohibit the enactment or
enforcement of state laws, rules, or regulations intended to aid in
the prevention, control, and extinguishment in the state.
Nothing in this compact affects any existing or future
cooperative relationship or arrangement between the United States
Forest Service and a member state or states.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
ARTICLE VII
Representatives of the United States Forest Service may attend
meetings of the compact administrators.
ARTICLE VIII
The provisions of Articles IV and V of this compact that relate
to reciprocal aid in combating, controlling, or preventing forest
fires are operative as between any state party to this compact and
any other state which is party to this compact and any other state
that is party to a regional forest fire protection compact in another
region if the Legislature of the other state has given its assent to
the mutual aid provisions of this compact.
ARTICLE IX
This compact shall continue in force and remain binding on
each state ratifying it until the Legislature or the Governor of the
state takes action to withdraw from the compact. Such action is
not effective until six months after notice of the withdrawal has
been sent by the chief executive of the state desiring to withdraw to
the chief executives of all states then parties to the compact.
Sec. 3. The Northwest Wildland Fire Protection Agreement
is hereby ratified, enacted into law and entered into with all
jurisdictions legally joining in the Agreement, in substantially the
form set forth in this section:
THE NORTHWEST WILDLAND FIRE
PROTECTION AGREEMENT
THIS AGREEMENT is entered into by and between the State,
Provincial, and Territorial wildland fire protection agencies
signatory hereto, hereinafter referred to as “Members”.
FOR AND IN CONSIDERATION OF the following terms and
conditions, the Members agree:
Article I
1.1 The purpose of this Agreement is to promote effective
prevention, presuppression and control of forest fires in the
Northwest wildland region of the United States and adjacent areas
of Canada (by the Members) by providing mutual aid in
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
prevention, presuppression and control of wildland fires, and by
establishing procedures in operating plans that will facilitate such
aid.
Article II
2.1 The agreement shall become effective for those Members
ratifying it whenever any two or more Members, the States of
Oregon, Washington, Alaska, Idaho, Montana, or the Yukon
Territory, or the Province of British Columbia, or the Province of
Alberta have ratified it.
2.2 Any State, Province, or Territory not mentioned in this
Article which is contiguous to any Member may become a party to
this Agreement subject to unanimous approval of the Members.
Article III
3.1 The role of the Members is to determine from time to time
such methods, practices, circumstances and conditions as may be
found for enhancing the prevention, presuppression, and control
of forest fires in the area comprising the Member’s territory; to
coordinate the plans and the work of the appropriate agencies of
the Members; and to coordinate the rendering of aid by the
Members to each other in fighting wildland fires.
3.2 The Members may develop cooperative operating plans
for the program covered by this Agreement. Operating plans shall
include definition of terms, fiscal procedures, personnel contacts,
resources available, and standards applicable to the program.
Other sections may be added as necessary.
Article IV
4.1 A majority of Members shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of its general business. Motions of Members present
shall be carried by a simple majority except as stated in Article II.
Each Member will have one vote on motions brought before them.
Article V
5.1 Whenever a Member requests aid from any other Member
in controlling or preventing wildland fires, the Members agree, to
the extent they possibly can, to render all possible aid.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
Article VI
6.1 Whenever the forces of any Member are aiding another
Member under this Agreement, the employees of such Member
shall operate under the direction of the officers of the Member to
which they are rendering aid and be considered agents of the
Member they are rendering aid to and, therefore, have the same
privileges and immunities as comparable employees of the
Member to which they are rendering aid.
6.2 No Member or its officers or employees rendering aid
within another State, Territory, or Province, pursuant to this
Agreement shall be liable on account of any act or omission on the
part of such forces while so engaged, or on account of
maintenance or use of any equipment or supplies in connection
therewith to the extent authorized by the laws of the Member
receiving the assistance. The receiving Member, to the extent
authorized by the laws of the State, Territory, or Province, agrees
to indemnify and save-harmless the assisting Member from any
such liability.
6.3 Any Member rendering outside aid pursuant to this
Agreement shall be reimbursed by the Member receiving such aid
for any loss or damage to, or expense incurred in the operation of
any equipment and for the cost of all materials, transportation,
wages, salaries and maintenance of personnel and equipment
incurred in connection with such request in accordance with the
provisions of the previous section. Nothing contained herein shall
prevent any assisting Member from assuming such loss, damage,
expense or other cost or from loaning such equipment or from
donating such services to the receiving Member without charge or
cost.
6.4 For purposes of this Agreement, personnel shall be
considered employees of each sending Member for the payment of
compensation to injured employees and death benefits to the
representatives of deceased employees injured or killed while
rendering aid to another Member pursuant to this Agreement.
6.5 The Members shall formulate procedures for claims and
reimbursement under the provisions of this Article.
Article VII
7.1 When appropriations for support of this agreement, or for
the support of common services in executing this agreement, are
needed, costs will be allocated equally among the Members.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
7.2 As necessary, Members shall keep accurate books of
account, showing in full, its receipts and disbursements, and the
books of account shall be open at any reasonable time to the
inspection of representatives of the Members.
7.3 The Members may accept any and all donations, gifts,
and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services
from the Federal or any local government, or any agency thereof
and from any person, firm or corporation, for any of its purposes
and functions under this Agreement, and may receive and use the
same subject to the terms, conditions, and regulations governing
such donations, gifts, and grants.
Article VIII
8.1 Nothing in this Agreement shall be construed to limit or
restrict the powers of any Member to provide for the prevention,
control, and extinguishment of wildland fires or to prohibit the
enactment or enforcement of State, Territorial, or Provincial laws,
rules or regulations intended to aid in such prevention, control
and extinguishment of wildland fires in such State, Territory, or
Province.
8.2 Nothing in this Agreement shall be construed to affect
any existing or future Cooperative Agreement between Members
and/or their respective Federal agencies.
Article IX
9.1 The Members may request the United States Forest
Service to act as the coordinating agency of the Northwest
Wildland Fire Protection Agreement in cooperation with the
appropriate agencies of each Member.
9.2 The Members will hold an annual meeting to review the
terms of this Agreement, any applicable Operating Plans, and
make necessary modifications.
9.3 Amendments to this Agreement can be made by simple
majority vote of the Members and will take effect immediately
upon passage.
Article X
10.1 This Agreement shall continue in force on each Member
until such Member takes action to withdraw therefrom. Such
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
action shall not be effective until 60 days after notice thereof has
been sent to all other members.
Article XI
11.1 Nothing in this Agreement shall obligate the funds of
any Member beyond those approved by appropriate legislative
action.
Sec. 4. The Governor shall give notice of the ratification of the
Great Plains Wildland Fire Protection Compact and the Northwest
Wildland Fire Protection Agreement by the Legislature of Nevada to
the member states of the Great Plains Wildland Fire Protection
Compact and the members of the Northwest Wildland Fire
Protection Agreement.
Sec. 5. 1. This section and sections 1 and 4 of this act
become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Section 2 of this act becomes effective on the date on which
the Governor of this State declares that this State has ratified the
Great Plains Wildland Fire Protection Compact and the State’s entry
has been approved.
3. Section 3 of this act becomes effective on the date on which
the Governor of this State declares that this State has ratified the
Northwest Wildland Fire Protection Agreement and the State’s entry
has been approved.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)